Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.145.080

Evaluation of opportunity scholarship and opportunity expansion programs by joint legislative audit and review committee.

(1) Beginning in 2018, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall evaluate the opportunity scholarship and opportunity expansion programs, and submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2018. The committee's evaluation shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The number and type of eligible education programs as determined by the opportunity scholarship board;

(b) The number of participants in the opportunity scholarship program in relation to the number of participants who completed a baccalaureate degree;

(c) The total cumulative number of students who received opportunity scholarships, and the total cumulative number of students who gained a baccalaureate degree after receiving an opportunity scholarship and the types of baccalaureate degrees awarded;

(d) The amount of private contributions to the opportunity scholarship program, annually and in total;

(e) The amount of state match moneys to the opportunity scholarship program, annually and in total;

(f) The amount of any administrative fees paid to the program administrator, annually and in total;

(g) The source and amount of funding, annually and cumulatively, for the opportunity expansion program;

(h) The number and type of proposals submitted by institutions for opportunity expansion awards, the number and type of proposals that received an award of opportunity expansion funds, and the amount of such awards;

(i) The total cumulative number of additional high employer demand degrees produced in Washington state due to the opportunity expansion program, including both the initial opportunity expansion awards and the subsequent inclusion in base funding; and

(j) Evidence that the existence of the opportunity scholarship and opportunity expansion programs have contributed to the achievement of the public policy objectives of helping to mitigate the impact of tuition increases, increasing the number of baccalaureate degrees in high employer demand and other programs, and investing in programs and students to meet market demands for a knowledge-based economy while filling middle-income jobs with a sufficient supply of skilled workers.

(2) In the event that the joint legislative audit and review committee is charged with completing an evaluation of other aspects of degree production, funding, or other aspects of higher education in 2018, and to the extent that it is economical and feasible to do so, the committee shall combine the multiple evaluations and submit a single report.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 9.]